Illinois, session 104th, SB311.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The County Cooperative Extension Law is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (505 ILCS 45/1)  (from Ch. 5, par. 241)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This law may be known and and cited as 8the "County Cooperative Extension Law."9(Source: Laws 1963, p. 2221.)